languages/apertium-mkd/apertium-mkd.mkd.dix
   <pardef n="минист/ер__n">
     <e>       <p>         <l>ер</l>           <r>ер<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ерот</l>  	   <r>ер<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>еров</l>         <r>ер<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ерон</l>         <r>ер<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ри</l>           <r>ер<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>рите</l>         <r>ер<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>риве</l>         <r>ер<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>рине</l>         <r>ер<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="мет/ар__n">
     <e>       <p>         <l>ар</l>           <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>арот</l>  	   <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>аров</l>         <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>арон</l>         <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ри</l>      	   <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>рите</l>         <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>риве</l>     	   <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>рине</l>         <r>ар<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="бра/т__n">
     <e>       <p>         <l>т</l>          <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>тот</l>  	   	 <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>тов</l>        <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>тон</l>        <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ќа</l>         <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ќата</l>       <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ќава</l>       <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ќана</l>       <r>т<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>


   <pardef n="каме/н__n">
     <e>       <p>         <l>н</l>          <r>н<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нот</l>  	   	 <r>н<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нов</l>        <r>н<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>нон</l>        <r>н<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>ња</l>         <r>н<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>њата</l>       <r>н<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>њава</l>       <r>н<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>њана</l>       <r>н<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>



   <pardef n="прило/г__n">
     <e>       <p>         <l>г</l>          <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>гот</l>  	   	 <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>гов</l>        <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>гон</l>        <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>зи</l>         <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>зите</l>       <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>зиве</l>       <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>зине</l>       <r>г<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>



   <pardef n="успе/х__n">
     <e>       <p>         <l>х</l>          <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>хот</l>  	   	 <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>хов</l>        <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>хон</l>        <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>си</l>         <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>сите</l>       <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>сиве</l>       <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
     <e>       <p>         <l>сине</l>       <r>х<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>


<pardef n="бугар/ин__n">
  <e>       <p>         <l>ин</l>        <r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>инот</l>  	 <r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>инов</l>      <r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>инон</l>      <r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>и</l>         <r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>ите</l>       <r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>иве</l>       <r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>ине</l>       <r>ин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="тур/чин__n">
  <e>       <p>         <l>чин</l>        <r>чин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>чинот</l>  	  <r>чин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>чинов</l>      <r>чин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>чинон</l>      <r>чин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>ци</l>         <r>чин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>ците</l>       <r>чин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>циве</l>       <r>чин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p>         <l>цине</l>       <r>чин<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

	<e lm="бугарин"><i>бугар</i><par n="бугар/ин__n"/></e>
	<e lm="русин"><i>рус</i><par n="бугар/ин__n"/></e>
	<e lm="граѓанин"><i>граѓан</i><par n="бугар/ин__n"/></e>
	<e lm="државјанин"><i>државјан</i><par n="бугар/ин__n"/></e>
	<e lm="србин"><i>срб</i><par n="бугар/ин__n"/></e>
	<e lm="турчин"><i>тур</i><par n="тур/чин__n"/></e>
	<e lm="министер"><i>минист</i><par n="минист/ер__n"/></e>
	<e lm="неуспех"><i>неуспе</i><par n="успе/х__n"/></e>
	<e lm="успех"><i>успе</i><par n="успе/х__n"/></e>
	<e lm="центар"><i>цент</i><par n="мет/ар__n"/></e>
	<e lm="амперметар"><i>ампермет</i><par n="мет/ар__n"/></e>
	<e lm="дијаметар"><i>дијамет</i><par n="мет/ар__n"/></e>
	<e lm="километар"><i>километ</i><par n="мет/ар__n"/></e>
	<e lm="метар"><i>мет</i><par n="мет/ар__n"/></e>
	<e lm="театар"><i>теат</i><par n="мет/ар__n"/></e>
	<e lm="камен"><i>каме</i><par n="каме/н__n"/></e>
    <e lm="предлог"><i>предло</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
    <e lm="маркетинг"><i>маркетин</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="биолог"><i>биоло</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="бубрег"><i>бубре</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="бураг"><i>бура</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="дијалог"><i>дијало</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="митинг"><i>митин</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="мониторинг"><i>мониторин</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="потег"><i>поте</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="рејтинг"><i>рејтин</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="сопруг"><i>сопру</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="археолог"><i>археоло</i><par n="прило/г__n"/></e>
	<e lm="патријарх"><i>патријар</i><par n="успе/х__n"/></e>
	<e lm="брат"><i>бра</i><par n="бра/т__n"/></e>
	<e lm="воздух"><i>возду</i><par n="успе/х__n"/></e>
